trunk/src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic_alias.aff
FLAG num
SFX 39 Y 1
SFX 39 0 y/161 . 284
SFX 500 Y 5
SFX 500 0 nk/144 . 288
SFX 500 0 nk/144 . 288
SFX 500 0 nkmA/144 . 288
SFX 500 0 nkm/144 . 288
SFX 500 0 nkn/144 . 288
SFX 469 Y 7
SFX 469 0 Anh/189 . 317
SFX 469 0 AnhmA/189 . 317
SFX 469 0 Anhm/189 . 317
SFX 469 0 AnhA/189 . 317
SFX 469 0 Anhn/189 . 317
SFX 469 0 Anny/189 . 317
SFX 469 0 AnnA/189 . 317
SFX 482 Y 5
SFX 482 0 Ank/188 . 320
SFX 482 0 Ank/188 . 320
SFX 482 0 AnkmA/188 . 320
SFX 482 0 Ankm/188 . 320
SFX 482 0 Ankn/188 . 320
SFX 470 Y 5
SFX 470 0 Ank/189 . 320
SFX 470 0 Ank/189 . 320
SFX 470 0 AnkmA/189 . 320
SFX 470 0 Ankm/189 . 320
SFX 470 0 Ankn/189 . 320
SFX 14 Y 1
SFX 14 0 At/161 . 251
SFX 540 Y 7
SFX 540 0 nh/171 . 235
SFX 540 0 nhmA/171 . 235
SFX 540 0 nhm/171 . 235
SFX 540 0 nhA/171 . 235
SFX 540 0 nhn/171 . 235
SFX 540 0 nny/171 . 235
SFX 540 0 nnA/171 . 235
SFX 542 Y 1
SFX 542 0 0/171 . 238
SFX 390 Y 7
SFX 390 0 Ah/206 . 233
SFX 390 0 AhmA/206 . 233
SFX 390 0 Ahm/206 . 233
SFX 390 0 AhA/206 . 233
SFX 390 0 Ahn/206 . 233
SFX 390 0 Any/206 . 233
SFX 390 0 AnA/206 . 233
SFX 541 Y 5
SFX 541 0 nk/171 . 240
SFX 541 0 nk/171 . 240
SFX 541 0 nkmA/171 . 240
SFX 541 0 nkm/171 . 240
SFX 541 0 nkn/171 . 240
SFX 33 Y 13
SFX 33 0 tA/161 . 273
SFX 33 0 tAh/161 . 273
SFX 33 0 tAhmA/161 . 273
SFX 33 0 tAhm/161 . 273
SFX 33 0 tAhA/161 . 273
SFX 33 0 tAhn/161 . 273
SFX 33 0 tAk/161 . 273
SFX 33 0 tAk/161 . 273
SFX 33 0 tAkmA/161 . 273
SFX 33 0 tAkm/161 . 273
SFX 33 0 tAkn/161 . 273
SFX 33 0 tAy/161 . 273
SFX 33 0 tAnA/161 . 273
SFX 303 Y 22
SFX 303 0 nh/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nhmA/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nhm/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nhA/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nhn/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nk/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nk/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nkmA/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nkm/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nkn/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nny/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nnA/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nAh/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nAhmA/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nAhm/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nAhA/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nAhn/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nAk/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nAk/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nAkmA/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nAkm/157 . 309
SFX 303 0 nAkn/157 . 309
SFX 561 Y 5
SFX 561 0 h/148 . 234
SFX 561 0 hmA/148 . 234
SFX 561 0 hm/148 . 234
SFX 561 0 hA/148 . 234
SFX 561 0 hn/148 . 234
SFX 391 Y 1
SFX 391 0 An/206 . 237
SFX 302 Y 2
SFX 302 0 0/157 . 311
SFX 302 0 A/157 . 311
SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34 0 tAn/161 . 229
SFX 200 Y 1
SFX 200 0 |t/154 . 285
SFX 562 Y 5
SFX 562 0 k/148 . 236
SFX 562 0 k/148 . 236
SFX 562 0 kmA/148 . 236
SFX 562 0 km/148 . 236
SFX 562 0 kn/148 . 236
SFX 78 Y 1
SFX 78 0 0/161 . 246
SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 0 0/161 . 228
SFX 89 Y 1
SFX 89 0 0/145 . 228
SFX 546 Y 7
SFX 546 0 nh/183 . 235
SFX 546 0 nhmA/183 . 235
SFX 546 0 nhm/183 . 235
SFX 546 0 nhA/183 . 235
SFX 546 0 nhn/183 . 235
SFX 546 0 nny/183 . 235
SFX 546 0 nnA/183 . 235
SFX 306 Y 6
SFX 306 0 0/157 . 313
SFX 306 0 0/157 . 313
SFX 306 0 0/157 . 313
SFX 306 0 mA/157 . 313
SFX 306 0 m/157 . 313
SFX 306 0 n/157 . 313
SFX 548 Y 1
SFX 548 0 0/183 . 238
SFX 547 Y 5
SFX 547 0 nk/183 . 240
SFX 547 0 nk/183 . 240
SFX 547 0 nkmA/183 . 240
SFX 547 0 nkm/183 . 240
SFX 547 0 nkn/183 . 240
SFX 393 Y 1
SFX 393 0 0/206 . 262
SFX 43 Y 1
SFX 43 0 tyn/161 . 268
SFX 137 Y 12
SFX 137 0 h/145 . 304
SFX 137 0 hmA/145 . 304
SFX 137 0 hm/145 . 304
SFX 137 0 hA/145 . 304
SFX 137 0 hn/145 . 304
SFX 137 0 k/145 . 304
SFX 137 0 k/145 . 304
SFX 137 0 kmA/145 . 304
SFX 137 0 km/145 . 304
SFX 137 0 kn/145 . 304
SFX 137 0 ny/145 . 304
SFX 137 0 nA/145 . 304
SFX 170 Y 1
SFX 170 0 ny/145 . 327
SFX 71 Y 7
SFX 71 0 yh/161 . 256
SFX 71 0 yhmA/161 . 256
SFX 71 0 yhm/161 . 256
SFX 71 0 yhA/161 . 256
SFX 71 0 yhn/161 . 256
SFX 71 0 yny/161 . 256
SFX 71 0 ynA/161 . 256
SFX 230 Y 1
SFX 230 0 0/156 . 228
SFX 146 Y 45
SFX 146 0 th/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 thmA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 thm/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 thA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 thn/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 th/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 thmA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 thm/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 thA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 thn/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 th/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 thmA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 thm/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 thA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 thn/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tk/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tk/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tkmA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tkm/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tkn/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tny/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tnA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tny/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tnA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tmAh/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tmAhmA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tmAhm/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tmAhA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tmAhn/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tmAny/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tmAnA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tmwh/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tmwhmA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tmwhm/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tmwhA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tmwhn/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tmwny/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tmwnA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tnh/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tnhmA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tnhm/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tnhA/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tnhn/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tnny/145 . 305
SFX 146 0 tnnA/145 . 305
SFX 51 Y 12
SFX 51 0 h/161 . 304
SFX 51 0 hmA/161 . 304
SFX 51 0 hm/161 . 304
SFX 51 0 hA/161 . 304
SFX 51 0 hn/161 . 304
SFX 51 0 k/161 . 304
SFX 51 0 k/161 . 304
SFX 51 0 kmA/161 . 304
SFX 51 0 km/161 . 304
SFX 51 0 kn/161 . 304
SFX 51 0 ny/161 . 304
SFX 51 0 nA/161 . 304
SFX 60 Y 45
SFX 60 0 th/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 thmA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 thm/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 thA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 thn/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 th/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 thmA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 thm/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 thA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 thn/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 th/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 thmA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 thm/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 thA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 thn/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tk/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tk/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tkmA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tkm/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tkn/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tny/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tnA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tny/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tnA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tmAh/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tmAhmA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tmAhm/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tmAhA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tmAhn/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tmAny/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tmAnA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tmwh/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tmwhmA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tmwhm/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tmwhA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tmwhn/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tmwny/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tmwnA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tnh/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tnhmA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tnhm/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tnhA/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tnhn/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tnny/161 . 305
SFX 60 0 tnnA/161 . 305
SFX 265 Y 11
SFX 265 0 h/159 . 294
SFX 265 0 hmA/159 . 294
SFX 265 0 hm/159 . 294
SFX 265 0 hA/159 . 294
SFX 265 0 hn/159 . 294
SFX 265 0 k/159 . 294
SFX 265 0 k/159 . 294
SFX 265 0 kmA/159 . 294
SFX 265 0 km/159 . 294
SFX 265 0 kn/159 . 294
SFX 265 0 nA/159 . 294
SFX 152 Y 1
SFX 152 0 0/145 . 306
SFX 329 Y 1
SFX 329 0 0/190 . 228
SFX 66 Y 1
SFX 66 0 0/161 . 306
SFX 255 Y 1
SFX 255 0 |t/159 . 285
SFX 268 Y 1
SFX 268 0 yn/159 . 260
SFX 496 Y 7
SFX 496 0 h/144 . 257
SFX 496 0 hmA/144 . 257
SFX 496 0 hm/144 . 257
SFX 496 0 hA/144 . 257
SFX 496 0 hn/144 . 257
SFX 496 0 ny/144 . 257
SFX 496 0 nA/144 . 257
